Wyoming, session 2025, HB0146.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-1-103 and 11-24-103 are amended to
read:

11-1-103. Penalty for violations.

HB0146

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0417
A person who violates any of the following sections commits
a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than
six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00), or both for the first offense, or by
imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not
more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), or
both for second or subsequent offenses: W.S. 11-6-210(a) or
(f), 11-18-112, 11-19-101, 11-19-102, 11-19-103, 11-19-111,
11-19-210, 11-19-215, 11-19-304, 11-19-306, 11-19-401,
11-20-114, 11-20-117, 11-20-229, 11-20-230, 11-21-104,
11-22-118, 11-23-106, 11-23-207, 11-24-103, 11-24-106,
11-26-101(b), 11-30-114 and 11-48-102. A person who
violates board rules promulgated pursuant to W.S.
11-18-103(a)(v) shall be subject to the penalties specified
in this section.

11-24-103. Taking up estrays; penalties.

(a) Any person who takes up or retains possession of
any estray without the owner's knowledge or consent, or who
in any manner restrains from liberty for the purpose of
using or making use of any estray without the knowledge and
consent of the owner shall be punished as provided in W.S.
HB0146

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0417
11-1-103 is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
shall be:

(i) Fined not less than seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00) and not more than one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500.00), imprisoned for not more than
six (6) months or both for the first offense;

(ii) Fined not less than one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500.00) and not more than three
thousand dollars ($3,000.00), imprisoned for not more than
one (1) year or both for a second or subsequent offenses.

Section 2. This act shall apply to any violation of
W.S. 11-24-103 occurring on or after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0146